Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2231.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5518. Interference with aircraft operations. (a) Offense defined.--A person commits a misdemeanor of the first degree if the person intentionally or knowingly aims the beam of a laser pointer or other light-emitting device at an occupied aircraft and the person knows or recklessly disregards that the aircraft is occupied.(b) Defense.--It is a defense to prosecution under this section if the person aiming the beam of the laser pointer or other light-emitting device was, at the time, any of the following:(1) A n authorized individual in the conduct of research 12345678910111213141516171819 and development or flight test operations conducted by an aircraft manufacturer, the Federal Aviation Administration or any other individual authorized by the Federal Aviation Administration to conduct the research and development or flight test operations.(2) A member of a law enforcement agency acting in an official capacity for the purpose of research, development, operations, testing or training.(3) An individual using a laser emergency signaling device to send an emergency distress signal.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:" Aircraft." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions)."Laser pointer." A device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic radiation by stimulated emission that emits a beam designed to be used by the operator as a pointer or highlighter to indicate, mark or identify a specific position, place, item or object."Light-emitting device." A device that emits a light of an intensity sufficient to impair or compromise the ability of an operator to control an aircraft.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2231PN2924 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324